Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 2

Licenses and Fees

57-3-201. License classifications.

The alcoholic beverage commission may issue, under this chapter, the following classes of licenses, in relation to alcoholic spirituous beverages exclusively, which shall consist of the following classes only:

Manufacturer's or distiller's or rectifier's license;

Liquor wholesaler's license;

Liquor retailer's license;

Winery license;

Winery direct shipper's license;

Alcoholic beverage collector's license;

Winemaking on premises facility license;

Farm wine permit; and

Wine at retail food store license.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.10 (Williams, § 6648.8); modified; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-114; Acts 2009, ch. 348, § 2; 2009, ch. 484, § 2; 2011, ch. 451, § 1; 2012, ch. 691, § 2; 2014, ch. 554, § 5; 2019, ch. 263, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding allowing an in-state or out-of-state entity to ship wine directly to consumers age 21 years or older in this state for personal use, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 348.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “Winery” at the beginning of (5).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 263, § 2. April 30, 2019.

Cross-References. Municipal inspection fees, title 57, ch. 3, part 5.

57-3-202. Manufacturer's or distiller's licenses — Qualifications of applicants — Fees — Permits to solicit orders — Penalty — Rules and regulations.

A manufacturer's or distiller's license may be issued, as hereinafter provided, for the manufacturing of alcoholic spirituous beverages or vintage alcoholic beverages. Any person, firm, or corporation desiring to manufacture for commercial purposes any alcoholic spirituous beverages or vintage alcoholic beverages shall make application to the commission for a license to manufacture the same, which application shall be in writing and verified, on the forms herein authorized, to be prescribed and furnished; and, thereupon, the commission may grant such license, subject to this chapter.

All applicants if individuals must be citizens of the United States, and all stockholders of any corporate licensee must likewise be citizens of the United States.

Such license shall not be issued unless and until there be paid to the commission a separate license fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Before an individual owner, officer, employee, or representative of any manufacturer, rectifier, or importer may solicit orders from a licensed wholesaler in this state, such individual owner, officer, employee, or representative shall be the holder of a permit issued by the commission. The fee for such permit shall be fifty dollars ($50.00). Such permit shall authorize the holder to solicit orders upon the premises of a licensed wholesaler. A representative may sell the products of, or represent more than one (1) manufacturer, rectifier, or importer and such affiliates or subsidiaries that the manufacturer, rectifier, or importer may control by means of ownership or the ownership of a controlling stock interest.

“Vintage alcoholic beverages,” as used in this section, means all wine sold by wholesalers licensed under § 57-3-203.

A manufacturer's license may be issued to a person, firm or corporation for the limited purpose of blending nonalcoholic products with alcoholic beverages on premises, either on its own behalf or on behalf of other entities pursuant to contract.

A licensee under this subsection (f) may obtain the alcoholic beverages for use in its blending operations from any entity holding a license or permit issued under this section, §§ 57-2-104, 57-3-203, and part 6 of this chapter.

A license may be issued to a manufacturer, under this subsection (f), notwithstanding the requirements of § 57-3-106.

A manufacturer, licensed under this subsection (f) for the limited purpose of blending, may sell, distribute or transport the product produced from its blending operations in accordance with this title.

Notwithstanding subsection (f), an establishment licensed to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption pursuant to chapter 4, part 1 of this title, may, without a manufacturer's license, produce, store and sell infused products pursuant to § 57-4-108.

The commission is empowered to make such regulations, investigations and audits as it may deem necessary for enforcing and preventing violations of this chapter.

A manufacturer's license issued or renewed under this section to a manufacturer shall also allow such manufacturer to sell at retail on the licensed premises of the manufacturer products that are manufactured on the manufacturer's premises; provided, that no more than five gallons (5 gal.) or one-sixth (1/6) of a barrel of its products may be sold to any one (1) individual per visit to the premises. The manufacturer may serve samples of the product manufactured or distilled at the premises to any person of legal drinking age with or without cost or may include such samples as part of a tour of the manufacturer's or distiller's premises available to the public with or without cost. Such samples may be made available at any location on the manufacturing premises permitted by federal law. The manufacturer shall disclose to the commission the location where samples are available. The hours of sale for the manufacturer to sell products at retail shall be between the hours of eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m (11:00 p.m) on Monday through Saturday and between the hours of ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Sunday.

A manufacturer electing to exercise the rights granted to it under subdivision (i)(1), may only sell at retail or provide samples of product that it has obtained from a wholesaler licensed under § 57-3-203, and such wholesaler shall remit all taxes imposed under §§ 57-3-302, 57-3-501 (which shall be collected from the manufacturer based upon its retail sales), and 57-6-201. For products acquired from a wholesaler by a manufacturer under this section, the wholesaler may permit the manufacturer to deliver its products to the location on its premises where such retail sales and samples will be effected, provided the wholesaler permitting such direct shipment must include the amounts delivered in its inventory and depletions for purposes of tax collections.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any manufacturer selling at retail with the license authorized by this subsection (i) shall pay a municipal inspection fee, described in § 57-3-501, if a municipality the manufacturer is located in imposes such inspection fee which shall then be remitted by the wholesaler as described in subdivision (i)(2).

A distiller's license issued or renewed under this section authorizes a distillery to sell to any person of legal drinking age alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises of the distillery, other than the bonded premises, where such consumption is also permitted by federal law. Distilled spirits sold under this subdivision (i)(4) must be manufactured on the premises of the distillery.

As used in subdivision (i)(4)(A), “premises,” for purposes of consumption on the premises:

Means any and all of the real property owned or leased by a distillery upon which the distillery is operated, including any real property owned by the distillery contiguous thereto; and

Does not mean the bonded premises of a distillery.

Samples served and alcoholic beverages sold for consumption on the premises of a distillery in accordance with this subsection (i) are not subject to the tax imposed by § 57-4-301(c).

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, and in addition to any rights and abilities already permitted under this subsection (i), a manufacturer electing to exercise the rights granted to it under this subsection (i), may sell alcoholic beverages at retail, sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, and serve samples of any finished product that is transferred from another site for which a manufacturer's license under this section has been issued to the same licensee, only under the circumstances and conditions as outlined in this subdivision (i)(6).

A manufacturer may sell product transferred between different sites described in one (1) manufacturer's alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau (TTB) permit; provided, that:

The site identified as the plant address in the manufacturer's alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau (TTB) permit manufactures a minimum of one thousand (1,000) proof gallons at that site annually (prorated for partial years);

Any site receiving transferred product has a minimum of two thousand square feet (2,000 sq. ft.) of bonded premises;

Any site transferring product only transfers product that is manufactured at that site or manufactured at another site for which a manufacturer's license under this section has been issued to the same licensee; and

Any site transferring or receiving transferred product must hold a manufacturer's license issued pursuant to this section.

A manufacturer may sell product transferred between sites described in separate manufacturer's alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau (TTB) permits; provided, that:

Any site transferring or receiving transferred product must hold a manufacturer's license issued pursuant to this section. Any site transferring product must have held the manufacturer's license for a minimum of three (3) years;

Any site receiving transferred product shall not receive more transferred product than the equivalent amount of the proof gallons distilled at the receiving site for each calendar year; and

Any site transferring product shall only transfer product that is distilled at that site or distilled at another site for which a manufacturer's license under this section has been issued to the same licensee.

Any manufacturer transferring or receiving product pursuant to this subdivision (i)(6) shall comply with the following requirements:

Provide written notice to the commission regarding the manufacturer's intent to transfer product, which notice shall specify the manufacturer's qualifications to transfer product pursuant to (i)(6)(B) or (i)(6)(C) and identify the address of each licensed premises that will transfer or receive transferred product;

The manufacturer shall comply with subdivision (i)(2) and the distance restrictions in §§ 57-2-109 and 57-2-103(d)(6), as applicable;

A manufacturer transferring or receiving product pursuant to subdivision (i)(6)(B) shall maintain sufficient records documenting that the gallonage and transfer requirements of subdivision (i)(6)(B)(i) are being met and, with its annual renewal, shall file a copy of such records along with copies of the manufacturer's TTB Forms 5110.40 and 5110.28 and an affidavit certifying the amount of product manufactured at the site to document that the licensee has complied with the gallonage and transfer requirements; and

A manufacturer transferring or receiving product pursuant to subdivision (i)(6)(C) shall maintain sufficient records documenting that the gallonage and transfer requirements of subdivision (i)(6)(C)(ii) are being met and, with its renewal, shall file a copy of such records along with copies of the manufacturer's TTB Form 5110.40 and an affidavit certifying the amounts of product distilled at the site receiving transferred product and the amount of transferred product the site received to document that the licensee has complied with the gallonage and transfer requirements.

Any records or reports filed in accordance with subdivision (i)(6)(D) are privileged and confidential and are not public records.

Failure to comply with the gallonage and transfer requirements of this subdivision (i)(6) may result in a civil penalty not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per gallon of the difference between the required gallonage and that disclosed in the licensee's affidavit filed in accordance with subdivision (i)(6)(D). Failure to comply with the gallonage and transfer requirements more than once within a three-year period may result in suspension or revocation of the manufacturer's license.

Any nonprofit association organized to encourage and support the manufacture of alcoholic beverages with three (3) or more manufacturers licensed under this section or non-manufacturer non-resident sellers licensed under § 57-3-602(c) as members shall be allowed to hold not more than fifteen (15) alcoholic beverage festivals per calendar year. Each festival shall not exceed a period of seventy-two (72) hours.

Any manufacturer licensed under this section or non-manufacturer non-resident seller licensed under § 57-3-602(c) participating in a festival authorized by this subsection (j) shall be allowed to transport, serve and offer complimentary samples of any alcoholic beverage lawfully manufactured by the manufacturer or on behalf of the non-manufacturer non-resident seller pursuant to § 57-3-602(c) for tasting at the festival.

Any manufacturer licensed under this section or non-manufacturer non-resident seller licensed under § 57-3-602(c) participating in a festival authorized by this subsection (j) shall be allowed to transport alcoholic beverages produced by that manufacturer or on behalf of that non-manufacturer non-resident seller to sell at the festival for consumption off-premises.

Any nonprofit association authorized by this subsection (j) to hold an alcoholic beverage festival shall apply for a special occasion license as defined in § 57-4-102, in order for participating manufacturers licensed under this section or non-manufacturer non-resident sellers licensed under § 57-3-602(c) to serve complimentary samples as described in subdivision (j)(2) and to sell alcoholic beverages produced by the manufacturers or on behalf of the non-manufacturer non-resident sellers for consumption off-premises.

Notwithstanding § 57-4-102(33)(A), a special occasion license issued for an alcoholic beverage festival authorized by this subsection (j) shall be for the duration of the festival for which application is made for a period not to exceed seventy-two (72) hours. A special occasion license issued pursuant to this subsection (j) shall only be available upon the payment of the fee as required by law for each separate day of the festival.

A nonprofit association authorized to conduct an alcoholic beverage festival pursuant to this subsection (j) shall be permitted to hold the festival in any municipality or county of the state in the manner provided in subdivision (j)(5).

A nonprofit association, as defined in subdivision (j)(1), is authorized to conduct an alcoholic beverage festival pursuant to this subsection (j) in a municipality or county of this state that has approved the sale of alcoholic beverages or has a licensed manufacturer located in that municipality or county, subject to complying with all permit requirements of the municipality or county, and in all other municipalities or counties upon receiving approval of the legislative body of the municipality or county to hold such festival at a location and in such manner authorized by such legislative body.

Any manufacturer licensed under this section shall be permitted to use items related to or incidental to the tasting of alcoholic beverages manufactured on the premises and such items may be mixed with such alcoholic beverages anywhere on or off the manufacturer's premises where tastings are permitted as well as at private events and events requiring a special occasion license. Such items may include, but are not limited to:

Bitters, whether manufactured on the premises or purchased at retail, used in the preparation or garnishment of alcoholic beverages or mixed alcoholic beverages;

Any and all garnishes and food items used in the preparation or garnishment of alcoholic beverages or mixed alcoholic beverages, including any juices, concentrates, and other ingredients used in the preparation of mixed alcoholic beverages;

Glassware and any other cups, glasses, or other containers normally used for serving drinks;

Ice, water, soft drinks, and any other nonalcoholic beverages; and

Other alcoholic beverages manufactured on the premises.

Tastings under subsection (i) shall be limited to one-half ounce (½ oz.) of alcohol per stock keeping unit (sku) per tasting;

Any manufacturer licensed under this section shall be permitted to rent or lease out any portion of their premises for any event, with or without charge, whether the event is public, private, requires a special occasion license as defined in § 57-4-102, or catered by a caterer licensed pursuant to chapter 4, part 1 of this title. Events cannot be held on the bonded premises or general premises of the manufacturer, as defined in 27 CFR part 19, unless the manufacturer has obtained prior approval from the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau (TTB) for such events pursuant to federal regulations.

Owners, officers, employees, and representatives of any manufacturer licensed under this section shall be permitted to touch, handle, and pour product of such manufacturer at any and all tastings permitted by law, including, but not limited to, consumer education seminars, employee education seminars, retail sales demonstrations, consumer tastings, private events, events requiring a special occasion license as defined in § 57-4-102, and any and all tastings permitted under this chapter, and any rules or regulations promulgated.

In the event of a conflict between any other law in this title and this subsection (k), this subsection (k) shall govern.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 6; 1945, ch. 167, § 3; 1949, ch. 284, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.11 (Williams, § 6648.9); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 18; Acts 1975, ch. 234, § 1; 1976, ch. 838, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-115; Acts 2006, ch. 616, § 1; 2012, ch. 968, § 5; 2013, ch. 445, § 3; 2014, ch. 1001, § 7; 2014, ch. 1015, §§ 8, 9; 2016, ch. 976, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 295, § 1; 2018, ch. 1027, § 1; 2019, ch. 94, § 1; 2020, ch. 774, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (i)(5).

The 2019 amendment substituted “ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Sunday” for “twelve o’clock (12:00) noon and seven o’clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.) on Sunday” at the end of (i)(1).

The 2020 amendment added (i)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1027, § 3. May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 94, § 3. March 28, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 774, § 2. July 15, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. The statutory provisions that prohibit retail sales by Tennessee liquor stores on Sundays and holidays but permit Tennessee distilleries to make retail sales on Sundays and holidays do not violate the Commerce Clause or equal protection guarantees. OAG 16-08, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 8 (3/1/2016).

The General Assembly may provide by private act that no proceeds from Bradley County's tourist accommodation tax may be distributed to or on behalf of any city located in the county. OAG 16-04, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (2/5/2016).

Licensed distilleries that sell their own alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, as authorized by T.C.A. §57-3-202(i)(4), must remit the 15% tax imposed on the sales price of each alcoholic beverage sold under T.C.A. §57-4-301(c)(1), because they are exercising the taxable privilege of “engag[ing] in the business of selling at retail in this state alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises.” These distilleries are not, however, required to remit the annual taxes imposed by §57-4-301(b)(1), which are specific to facilities licensed under T.C.A.57-4-101 et seq. OAG 18-12, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (3/16/2018).

57-3-203. Wholesaler's licenses — Qualifications of applicants — Permits — Salespersons — Employees — Fees — Disposition of alcoholic beverages after nonlicensed persons secure title.

Any person, or general or limited partnership desiring to sell at wholesale any alcoholic spirituous beverage shall make application to the commission for a license so to do, which application shall be in writing and verified, on the forms herein authorized to be prescribed and furnished; thereupon the commission may grant such license subject to the restrictions of this chapter.

Each applicant for a wholesale license shall pay to the commission a one-time, nonrefundable fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) when the application is submitted for review. Such wholesaler's license, however, shall not be issued unless and until there shall be paid to the commission a separate license fee therefor of three thousand dollars ($3,000), and no license shall be issued except to individuals who are citizens of this state and either have been for at least the two (2) years next preceding citizens of this state or have been citizens of this state at any time for at least fifteen (15) consecutive years.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, it shall be lawful for any qualified applicant, including a corporation meeting the requirements of subsection (f), to receive and operate under both an alcoholic beverage wholesaler's license issued pursuant to this part, and a beer wholesaler's license issued pursuant to § 57-5-102, upon satisfying all federal, state and local registration and permitting requirements applicable to both operations. Nothing in this title is intended or shall be construed to prohibit a wholesaler licensed under this part or under chapter 5 of this title from holding more than one (1) license or permit for the wholesale of alcoholic beverages or beer in this state.

No wholesale alcoholic spirituous beverage license shall be issued until the applicant has secured a basic permit to engage in the wholesale liquor business from the federal government.

Each representative or salesperson of any wholesale licensee in this state must obtain a permit from the commission before soliciting orders from retail licensees. No other person shall be allowed to solicit orders for alcoholic beverages from retail licensees, and retail licensees shall not give an order to anyone other than the holder of a wholesale salesperson's permit.

Where a wholesaler licensed under this part also maintains a beer wholesale operation as provided in subdivision (b)(2), it shall be lawful for anyone holding a permit pursuant to this subsection (d) to carry out similar duties with respect to such beer wholesale operation; provided, that the permit holder has also satisfied any legal requirements applicable to such function within a beer wholesale operation.

Every wholesale licensee shall, before employing any person to dispense alcoholic beverages, secure from the commission an employee's permit authorizing such person to serve as an employee in the place of business of such wholesaler. It is made the duty of the wholesaler to see that each person dispensing alcoholic beverages in the wholesaler's place of business has an employee's permit as above required, which permit must be on the person of such employee or upon the premises of the licensee at all times, subject to inspection by the commission or its duly authorized agent. Nothing in this subdivision (e)(1) requires an employee of a wholesaler to obtain a permit unless the employee is directly involved with the delivery or sale of alcoholic beverages. Employees involved only in warehousing, administrative, or clerical services for a wholesaler are not required to obtain a permit under this subdivision (e)(1).

Where a wholesaler licensed under this part also maintains a beer wholesale operation as provided in subdivision (b)(2), it shall be lawful for anyone holding a permit pursuant to this subsection (e) to carry out similar duties with respect to such beer wholesale operation; provided, that the permit holder has also satisfied any legal requirements applicable to such function within a beer wholesale operation.

A wholesaler's license may, in the discretion of the commission, be issued to a corporation; provided, that no license shall be issued to any corporation unless such corporation meets the following requirements:

All of its capital stock must be owned by individuals who have been residents of Tennessee for not less than five (5) years next preceding or who at any time have been residents of this state for at least fifteen (15) consecutive years, and who have not been convicted within a period of five (5) years preceding acquisition of such stock for violation of either state or United States prohibition laws or revenue laws relating to intoxicating liquors;

No person owning stock in such corporation shall have any interest as partner or otherwise in a business licensed to engage in the retail sale of intoxicating liquors in Tennessee;

No stock of any corporation licensed under this subsection (f) shall be transferred to any person who has not been a resident of Tennessee for at least five (5) years next preceding or who at any time has not been a resident of Tennessee for at least fifteen (15) consecutive years.

The commission is hereby authorized to revoke the wholesale license of any corporation which fails to comply with this subsection (f).

Notwithstanding subsection (f), the commission, in its discretion, may issue a wholesale license to any corporation which has been domiciled in this state for twenty-five (25) years, or which has acquired substantially all of the assets of a Tennessee partnership (or limited liability company) which partnership (or limited liability company) has been continuously operating in this state for ten (10) years where such corporation has the majority of its assets located in this state and all of whose officers in actual control of the wholesale operations shall be actively present at the licensed premises and who are in actual charge of the operations of the wholesaler substantially full- time. If any officers of such corporation have been convicted of any violation of the criminal code or of any violation relating to the enforcement of the liquor laws, no license under this subsection (g) shall issue.

If at any time subsequent to the granting of a wholesale liquor license to any such corporation, the majority of its assets shall cease to remain and be located in this state, and if any of its active officers shall cease to be residents of Tennessee, then the commission, within its discretion, shall have the right to revoke such license. The commission is further granted the right to make investigations at any time to ascertain if the majority of the assets of such corporation are located within this state and whether all of its active officers are residents of Tennessee, as above set out, and should its findings be in the negative, it may revoke such license. The foregoing shall apply irrespective of the provisions contained in § 57-3-404(d).

No license entitling the holder thereof to sell or deal in alcoholic spirituous beverages at wholesale shall be granted except in respect to premises situated within either a county having a population in excess of one hundred twenty thousand (120,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or a county in which the voters of any municipality or other jurisdiction within that county have approved retail package sales or consumption of alcoholic beverages on premises by referendum as provided in this title.

Notwithstanding the requirement imposed in subdivision (i)(1), a wholesale liquor license, limited to the sale and distribution of wine only, not to exceed six thousand (6,000) cases of wine per year, may be issued to an entity that is located in any municipality which:

Has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises pursuant to § 57-4-103;

Has a bond rating of AAA issued by a nationally recognized bond rating agency; and

Is located within a county which has a bond rating of AAA issued by a nationally recognized bond rating agency.

When a person not licensed under this chapter secures title to any alcoholic beverage owned by a wholesaler as a result of a default on loans or revocation of license, the manufacturer, rectifier, distiller or vintner who sold the alcoholic beverage to the wholesaler shall purchase the alcoholic beverage from the nonlicensed person who secured title in order that the creditors are satisfied. Any manufacturer, rectifier, distiller or vintner who fails within thirty (30) days following default or revocation of license of the wholesaler to effect the purchase from the nonlicensed person who secured title shall not be allowed to ship or sell any alcoholic beverage in this state until the purchase is effected.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 7; 1945, ch. 167, § 4; 1947, ch. 73, § 1; 1947, ch. 166, § 1; 1949, ch. 284, §§ 3, 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.12 (Williams, § 6648.10); Acts 1951, ch. 98, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1961, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, §§ 11, 19; Acts 1967, ch. 215, § 3; 1972, ch. 656, § 1; 1976, ch. 505, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-116; Acts 1995, ch. 396, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 876, § 5; 2012, ch. 592, § 1; 2013, ch. 394, § 1; 2014, ch. 554, §§ 21-24; 2017, ch. 443, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Nonresident sellers, title 57, ch. 3, part 6.

Nonresident seller's permittees prohibited from interest in business licensed under this section, §57-3-604.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 8, 11, 15.

Attorney General Opinions. Pursuant to T.C.A.§57-3-203(f), the Alcoholic Beverage Commission may issue a wholesaler's license only to a corporation whose stock is owned by individuals who meet certain statutory requirements, and not to a corporation owned by another form of business such as another corporation, limited liability company, or trust. OAG 11-48, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (5/26/11).

The residency and corporate asset location requirements for applicants seeking a license as an alcoholic beverage wholesaler or package retailer under T.C.A. §§57-3-203 and57-3-204 violate the Commerce Clause of the United States Constitution. OAG 12-59, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 59 (6/6/12).